Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF223.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2583XS (3) 91 lh/ko S.F. 223 Section 1. APPROPRIATION ââ REFUGEE RESETTLEMENT 1 ASSISTANCE. 2 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 3 to the department of health and human services for the fiscal 4 year beginning July 1, 2024, and ending June 30, 2025, the 5 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 6 used for the purposes designated: 7 For distribution to nonprofit resettlement agencies 8 participating in the reception and placement assistance program 9 under a cooperative agreement with the United States department 10 of state for expenses incurred to provide resettlement 11 assistance to refugees in Iowa. 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,500,000 13 2. The department of health and human services shall 14 distribute the appropriated moneys proportionally to each 15 nonprofit resettlement agency based on the number of refugees 16 each nonprofit resettlement agency sponsors under the nonprofit 17 resettlement agencyâs cooperative agreement with the United 18 States department of state. 19 3. The department of health and human services shall 20 distribute the appropriated moneys no later than seven calendar 21 days after the effective date of this Act. 22 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 23 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 24